Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.071

Budget hearing—Alternate date for budget hearing.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board of county commissioners may meet for the purpose of holding a budget hearing, provided for in RCW 36.40.070, on the first Monday in December. The board of county commissioners may also set other dates relating to the budget process, including but not limited to the dates set in RCW 36.40.010, 36.40.050, and 36.81.130 to conform to the alternate date for the budget hearing.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 136 s 1.]